District of Columbia statutes.
7-1202.01

Disclosures by client authorization.

Except as provided in § 7-1202.06, a mental health professional, mental health facility, data collector or employee or agent of a mental health professional, mental health facility or data collector shall disclose mental health information and a client in a group session may disclose mental health information upon the voluntary written authorization of the person or persons who have the power to authorize disclosure under § 7-1202.05.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 201, 25 DCR 5055

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1202.02 and § 7-1202.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2011.
1973 Ed., § 6-1615.